Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.357

Interstate physician assistant licensure compact.

(1) Information in documents distributed to the Washington medical commission by the interstate physician assistant licensure compact as described in RCW 18.71C.070(2), including identifying information, licensure data, adverse actions against a license or compact privilege, or license application denials and the reason(s) for such denial, is exempt from disclosure under this chapter. Such information may be requested from the state of origin.

(2) The exemption in subsection (1) of this section does not pertain to any records created by the Washington medical commission from the documents described in subsection (1) of this section or any other materials created by the Washington medical commission.

[ 2024 c 53 s 15.]